Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.228

Fees—Exception.

The director must establish fees sufficient to cover, but not exceed, the costs of administering this chapter. These fees may include:

(1) An annual assessment paid by each licensee on or before a date specified by rule;

(2) An investigation fee to cover the costs of any investigation of the books and records of a licensee or other person subject to this chapter; and

(3) An application fee to cover the costs of processing applications made to the director under this chapter.

Mortgage brokers, loan originators, and any person subject to licensing under this chapter must not be charged investigation fees for the processing of complaints when the investigation determines that no violation of this chapter occurred or when the mortgage broker or loan originator provides a remedy satisfactory to the complainant and the director and no order of the director is issued. All moneys, fees, and penalties collected under the authority of this chapter must be deposited into the financial services regulation fund, unless the consumer services account is created as a dedicated, nonappropriated account, in which case all moneys, fees, and penalties collected under this chapter must be deposited in the consumer services account.

[ 2015 c 229 s 15; 2009 c 528 s 5; 2006 c 19 s 15; 2001 c 177 s 5; 1997 c 106 s 13; 1994 c 33 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.

Effective date—2001 c 177: See note following RCW 43.320.080.

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.